test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_vihkad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - vihkâđ: # MLO checked
    vihkâđ+V+Inf: vihkâđ
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viihkâm
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viihkah
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vihká
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vihkeen
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vihkâvettee
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vihkâv
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vihkâp
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vihkâvetteđ
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vihkih
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vihkim
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vihkih
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viihkâi
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vihkáim
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vihkáid
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vihkáin
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viihkâim
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viihkâid
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vihkii
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vihkâččim
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vihkâččih
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vihkâččij
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vihkâččáim
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vihkâččáid
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vihkâččáin
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vihkâččijm
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vihkâččijd
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vihkâččii
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vihkeem
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vihkeeh
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viihkâš
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vihkâžeen
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: viihkâšvettee
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vihkâžává
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vihkâžep
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viihkâšvetteđ
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vihkâžeh
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viihkâ
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: viihkus
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vihkoon
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vihkee
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vihkus
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vihkup
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vihkâđ
    vihkâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vihkus
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viihkâ
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vihkâm
    vihkâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: vihkâččii
    vihkâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vihkii
    vihkâđ+V+PrsPrc: vihkee
    vihkâđ+V+PrfPrc: vihkâm
    vihkâđ+V+Actio+Nom: vihkâm
    vihkâđ+V+Actio+Ess: vihkâmin
    vihkâđ+V+Actio+Loc: vihkâmist
    vihkâđ+V+Actio+Ill: vihkâmân
    vihkâđ+V+Actio+Com: vihkâdijn
    vihkâđ+V+VAbess: vihkâhánnáá
